Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 8.3
BLIND-MADE PRODUCTS - REGISTRATION

Section

26-8.3-101. Legislative declaration.

It is the purpose of this article to protect blind persons and organizations established to aid blind persons in the sale of blind-made products and to prevent misrepresentation in connection with the sale of blind-made products.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1100, § 1, effective October 1.

26-8.3-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Blind-made products" means those goods, wares, and merchandise for which blind persons perform at least seventy-five percent of the total hours of direct labor of manufacture.

"Blind person" means a person having not more than 20/200 central visual acuity in the better eye with correcting lenses or an equally disabling loss of the visual field as evidenced by a limitation to the field of vision in the better eye to such a degree that its widest diameter subtends an angle of no greater than twenty degrees.

"Direct labor" means all work required for manufacture, but does not include the supervision, administration, shipping, inspection, or packaging of products.

"Manufacture" means the preparation, processing, and assembling of goods, wares, or merchandise, including manufacture by subcontracting of component materials.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1100, § 1, effective October 1.

26-8.3-103. Registration - investigation.

Any persons engaged in the manufacture or distribution of blind-made products may apply to the state department on forms provided by the department for a registration and an authorization to use an official imprint, stamp, symbol, or label, designed or approved by the state department, to identify goods and articles as blind-made products. The state department shall investigate each application to assure that such person is actually engaged in the manufacture or distribution of blind-made products. The state department may approve applications by nonresident persons, without investigation, upon proof that they are recognized and approved by their state of residence, state of doing business, or organization pursuant to a law of such state imposing requirements substantially similar to those prescribed in this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1101, § 1, effective October 1.

26-8.3-104. Identification of blind-made products.

No goods or articles made in this or any other state shall be displayed, advertised, offered for sale, or sold in this state upon a representation that the same are blind-made products unless identified as such by the official imprint, stamp, symbol, or label designed or approved by the state department.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1101, § 1, effective October 1.

26-8.3-105. Violations - penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to use or employ, willfully or knowingly, the official imprint, stamp, symbol, or label designed or approved by the state department, unless such use is authorized by the state department, as provided for in section 26-8.3-103. Each such use is a separate offense.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully or knowingly represent, directly or indirectly, by any means, for the purpose of financial gain to himself, that particular goods, wares, or merchandise are blind-made products if such products are not blind-made products. Every product so misrepresented is a separate offense.

On and after October 1, 1979, any person who violates any of the provisions of this section commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1101, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1540, § 278, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3244, § 490, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.